Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,104
Official or full-time employee of executive branch; not to represent a person or act as an expert witness; when; violation; penalty.

(1) An official or full-time employee of the executive branch of state government shall not represent a person or act as an expert witness for compensation before a government body when the action or nonaction of the government body is of a nonministerial nature, except in a matter of public record in a court of law.

(2) This prohibition shall not apply to an official or employee acting in an official capacity.

(3) Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 104;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 56;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 52.